Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
ARTICLE 5.5
FISH HEALTH BOARD

Section

33-5.5-101. Fish health board - created.

There is hereby created and established in the division a fish health board, which shall consist of five members, each of whom shall be appointed no later than sixty days after June 7, 1991. The members of the board shall be as follows:

One member who is not a commercial aquaculturist and who may be an employee of the department of agriculture, appointed by the commissioner of agriculture;

One member who may be an employee of the division, appointed by the director;

Two members who are engaged in the private business of aquaculture and who shall, insofar as is possible, represent the various segments of the aquaculture industry and the various geographic areas of the state, appointed by the commissioner of agriculture; and

One member who is an employee of the United States fish and wildlife service, appointed by the regional director thereof.

The term of office of said members shall be three years; but of the members first appointed to the board, two members shall be appointed for one-year terms, two members shall be appointed for two-year terms, and the remaining member shall be appointed for a three-year term. The assignment of such initial terms shall be made by the director. Each member shall serve until his or her successor has been appointed and qualified, and any member shall be eligible for reappointment. The appointing entity shall fill any vacancy by appointment for the remainder of an unexpired term. The commissioner of agriculture and the director of the division shall be ex officio nonvoting members of the board. Board members shall serve without compensation except for actual and necessary traveling expenses. The board shall meet at least once each year and additionally as necessary.

The fish health board shall annually elect a chairman and a vice-chairman, each of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the board.

A majority of the fish health board shall constitute a quorum, and, if a quorum is present, in person or by telephone, the board may act upon a vote of a majority of those present.

The fish health board shall constitute a "public entity" and each member and employee of the board shall constitute a "public employee" within the meaning of the "Colorado Governmental Immunity Act", article 10 of title 24, C.R.S.

The fish health board is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105, and exercises its powers and performs its duties and functions specified in this article 5.5 under the department and the executive director thereof.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 197, § 3, effective June 7.

L. 2022:

(6) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3408, § 158, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

33-5.5-102. Duties of the fish health board.

The fish health board shall review or initiate and consider, prior to presentation to the commission for adoption, every rule which is to regulate or control, or otherwise relates to, fish health, the spread of aquatic disease within private aquaculture facilities or cultured aquatic stock, or the importation into the state or the distribution of any exotic aquatic species.

After considering any proposed rule, the fish health board shall vote to approve or disapprove the rule.

The proposed rules approved by the fish health board shall be sent to the commission with the recommendation to adopt. The commission shall, through its normal regulatory review procedure, timely review the rule and act either to adopt or to decline to adopt the rule. In the event the commission declines to adopt the rule, it shall convey its decision to the board, along with an explanation of the reason for its decision.

The proposed rules disapproved by the fish health board shall not be forwarded to the commission unless the director determines that a situation or condition exists which threatens to have a serious impact on existing aquatic populations and that the proposed regulation should be considered by the commission in spite of the recommendation of the fish health board. The director shall then forward the rule to the commission along with a recommendation of disapproval from the fish health board.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish or supersede the authority of the division or the commission to regulate or manage wild populations of aquatic organisms in the waters of the state or in facilities controlled or managed by the division or by the United States fish and wildlife service.

The fish health board shall review any orders for the destruction of aquatic organisms or quarantines of aquaculture facilities which last beyond thirty days, and all such orders shall be conditioned upon the board's approval; except that destruction orders may be approved by the director of the division upon a determination that a situation exists which threatens imminent danger to existing aquatic populations or to human health and safety, and that no more reasonable means exist to control the condition.

Destruction of aquatic organisms or quarantines shall be done in accordance with applicable regulations of the division.

The board shall periodically review division rules relating to destruction or quarantine of aquaculture stock or facilities and recommend appropriate changes to the commission.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 198, § 3, effective June 7.

L. 2012:

(8) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1209, § 21, effective June 4.